Hawaii statutes.
[§663-23 Refund of payments.] If such
action results in a final judgment for defendant, plaintiff, upon receipt of a
written demand, shall refund to defendant or defendant's insurance company any
advance payment made to or for the plaintiff by defendant or defendant's
insurance company. [L 1969, c 233, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next